New Jersey, session 222, S1173.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Access Link service means the paratransit service implemented by the corporation for purposes of complying with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.), and any regulations promulgated thereunder. Corporation means the New Jersey Transit Corporation. Minimum paratransit service area means the minimum areas in which the corporation is required to make available paratransit service, as required under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.), and any regulations promulgated thereunder, including, but not limited to, 49 C.F.R. s.37.131. Veterans health care facility means any health care facility that is located in the State and that is operated by the United States Veterans Health Administration. 2.    a.  The corporation shall provide, or cause to be provided, origin-to-destination Access Link service to and from each veterans health care facility in this State, regardless of whether the facility is located within the minimum paratransit service area. b.    (1)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to the minimum paratransit service area, the Access Link service area shall include all origins and destinations within: (a)   a radius of 1.5 miles around each veterans health care facility; and (b)   a width of 1.5 miles on each side of the most direct route connecting each veterans health care facility to the corporations closest existing fixed bus route or light rail station. (2)   Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary, the Access Link service area shall not include any origins or destinations in which the corporation does not have the legal authority to operate paratransit service. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the provision of Access Link service to: (1)   any person who is not eligible for Access Link service; and (2)   any origin or destination that is outside of the minimum paratransit service area and the additional service area required under subsection b. of this section. 3.    The corporation shall not enter into any contract, or exercise any option to extend an existing contract, concerning the provision of Access Link service by a paratransit service provider unless the contract or option complies with the requirements of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.    There is appropriated $1,000,000 from the General Fund to the New Jersey Transit Corporation to defray any costs incurred by the corporation in the implementation of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 5.    This act shall take effect immediately, except that the provisions of section 2 of this act shall remain inoperative until the first day of the third month following the date of enactment, and except that the provisions of section 3 of this act shall only apply to contracts and options executed after the date of enactment.